Florida, session 2026, SB556.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âParagraph (f) of subsection (3) and paragraph 15 (b) of subsection (8) of section 1003.4282, Florida Statutes, 16 are amended to read: 17 1003.4282âRequirements for a standard high school diploma.â 18 (3)âSTANDARD HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA; COURSE AND ASSESSMENT 19 REQUIREMENTS.â 20 (f)âOne credit in physical education.âPhysical education 21 must include the integration of health. Participation in an 22 interscholastic sport at the junior varsity or varsity level for 23 two full seasons shall satisfy the one-credit requirement in 24 physical education. A district school board may not require that 25 the one credit in physical education be taken during the 9th 26 grade year. Completion of 2 years of marching band shall satisfy 27 the one-credit requirement in physical education and or the one 28 credit requirement in performing arts. This credit may not be 29 used to satisfy the personal fitness requirement or the 30 requirement for adaptive physical education under an individual 31 education plan (IEP) or 504 plan. Completion of one semester 32 with a grade of âCâ or better in a marching band class, in a 33 physical activity class that requires participation in marching 34 band activities as an extracurricular activity, or in a dance 35 class shall satisfy one-half credit in physical education or 36 one-half credit in performing arts. This credit may not be used 37 to satisfy the personal fitness requirement or the requirement 38 for adaptive physical education under an IEP or 504 plan. 39 Completion of 2 years in a Reserve Officer Training Corps 40 (R.O.T.C.) class, a significant component of which is drills, 41 shall satisfy the one-credit requirement in physical education 42 and the one-credit requirement in performing arts. This credit 43 may not be used to satisfy the personal fitness requirement or 44 the requirement for adaptive physical education under an IEP or 45 504 plan. 46 (8)âSTUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES.âBeginning with students 47 entering grade 9 in the 2014-2015 school year, this subsection 48 applies to a student with a disability. 49 (b)âThe following options, in addition to the other options 50 specified in this section, may be used to satisfy the standard 51 high school diploma requirements, as specified in the studentâs 52 individual education plan: 53 1.âFor a student with a disability for whom the IEP team 54 has determined that the Florida Alternate Assessment is the most 55 appropriate measure of the studentâs skills: 56 a.âA combination of course substitutions, assessments, 57 industry certifications, other acceleration options, or 58 occupational completion points appropriate to the studentâs 59 unique skills and abilities that meet the criteria established 60 by State Board of Education rule. 61 b.âA portfolio of quantifiable evidence that documents a 62 studentâs mastery of academic standards through rigorous metrics 63 established by State Board of Education rule. A portfolio may 64 include, but is not limited to, documentation of work 65 experience, internships, community service, and postsecondary 66 credit. 67 2.âA student with a disability may participate in the 68 Special Olympics as a course substitution for the physical 69 education requirement under paragraph (3)(f). A student who 70 chooses this option must participate in the Special Olympics for 71 one school year, as determined by the studentâs IEP team. 72 3.âFor a student with a disability for whom the IEP team 73 has determined that mastery of academic and employment 74 competencies is the most appropriate way for a student to 75 demonstrate his or her skills: 76 a.âDocumented completion of the minimum high school 77 graduation requirements, including the number of course credits 78 prescribed by rules of the State Board of Education. 79 b.âDocumented achievement of all annual goals and short 80 term objectives for academic and employment competencies, 81 industry certifications, and occupational completion points 82 specified in the studentâs transition plan. The documentation 83 must be verified by the IEP team. 84 c.âDocumented successful employment for the number of hours 85 per week specified in the studentâs transition plan, for the 86 equivalent of 1 semester, and payment of a minimum wage in 87 compliance with the requirements of the federal Fair Labor 88 Standards Act. 89 d.âDocumented mastery of the academic and employment 90 competencies, industry certifications, and occupational 91 completion points specified in the studentâs transition plan. 92 The documentation must be verified by the IEP team, the 93 employer, and the teacher. The transition plan must be developed 94 and signed by the student, parent, teacher, and employer before 95 placement in employment and must identify the following: 96 (I)âThe expected academic and employment competencies, 97 industry certifications, and occupational completion points; 98 (II)âThe criteria for determining and certifying mastery of 99 the competencies; 100 (III)âThe work schedule and the minimum number of hours to 101 be worked per week; and 102 (IV)âA description of the supervision to be provided by the 103 school district. 104 4.3.âAny change to the high school graduation option 105 specified in the studentâs IEP must be approved by the parent 106 and is subject to verification for appropriateness by an 107 independent reviewer selected by the parent as provided in s. 108 1003.572. 109 110 The State Board of Education shall adopt rules under ss. 111 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement this subsection, including 112 rules that establish the minimum requirements for students 113 described in this subsection to earn a standard high school 114 diploma. The State Board of Education shall adopt emergency 115 rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54. 116 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.